Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-530
Involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers; term, defined; legislative findings.

(1) For purposes of sections 79-530 to 79-533.03, educational decisionmaker means a person designated or ordered by a court to make educational decisions on behalf of a child.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) That involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers is a key factor in the education of children;

(b) That such individuals need to be informed of the educational practices affecting their children; and

(c) That public schools should foster and facilitate access by such individuals to information about and involvement in educational practices affecting their children.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature, through the enactment of sections 79-531 to 79-533.03, to strengthen the level of involvement and participation by parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers in the public school system of the state.

Laws 1994, LB 1161, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,242;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 283;

Laws 2024, LB71, § 1.
July 19, 2024